Illinois, session 104th, HB2333.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Statute on Statutes is amended by adding 5Section 1.46 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 70/1.46 new)7    Sec. 1.46. Electronic data processing. Any reference to 8the term "electronic data processing" in any statute of the 9State, any rule adopted by an administrative agency of the 10State, or any appropriations Act of the State includes 11information technology, as defined in Section 24.1 of the 12State Finance Act, unless the context clearly requires 13otherwise. 14    Section 7. The State Comptroller Act is amended by 15changing Section 13.1 as follows: 16    (15 ILCS 405/13.1)  (from Ch. 15, par. 213.1)17    Sec. 13.1. Compliance with State Employment Records Act. 18The Comptroller, for the purpose of facilitating an accurate 19compilation of the entire State work force as defined and 20required by the State Employment Records Act, shall report, on 21the Comptroller's website, payroll information as permitted   HB2333 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 06070 HLH 17842 b1under this Act. on a fiscal year basis, the total number of 2payroll warrants drawn for the payment of salaries for State 3employees, including contractual payroll system CO-2 vouchers 4(or their administrative equivalent) or any other information 5necessary to comply with that Act. The State Employment 6Records (SER) report shall be maintained and kept on file as 7public information within the Office of the Comptroller.8    The total number of payroll warrants drawn by the Board of 9Trustees of the University of Illinois, the Board of Trustees 10of Southern Illinois University, the Board of Governors of 11State Colleges and Universities, the Board of Regents and all 12educational institutions governed by those boards to be paid 13from funds retained in their own treasuries shall be filed 14with the Office of the Secretary of State by the respective 15boards and educational institutions in the same manner.16    Multiple payroll warrants issued to the same person shall 17be noted with multiple warrants counted and reported as one 18payroll warrant count for the purposes of the State Employment 19Records Act. The total State remuneration to persons paid by 20multiple payroll warrants or, if applicable, contractual 21payroll system CO-2 vouchers, or both, shall be reported 22separately by agency.23(Source: P.A. 87-1211.) 24    Section 8. The Secretary of State Merit Employment Code is 25amended by changing Section 6 as follows:   HB2333 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 06070 HLH 17842 b1    (15 ILCS 310/6)  (from Ch. 124, par. 106)2    Sec. 6. Director - appointment - qualifications. The 3Department of Personnel shall have an officer at its head who 4shall be known as Director of Personnel. He shall be appointed 5by the Secretary of State, by and with the advice and consent 6of the Senate. The Director of Personnel shall be a person who 7shall have had practical working experience in the field of 8personnel administration. 9(Source: P.A. 85-378.) 10    Section 9. The Comptroller Merit Employment Code is 11amended by changing Section 6 as follows: 12    (15 ILCS 410/6)  (from Ch. 15, par. 409)13    Sec. 6. Director - appointment - qualifications. The 14Department of Human Resources shall have an officer at its 15head who shall be known as the Director. He or she shall be 16appointed by the Comptroller, by and with the advice and 17consent of the Senate. The Director shall be a person who shall 18have had practical working experience in the field of 19personnel administration. The director shall be selected for 20appointment from among those persons who for the two years 21next preceding the appointment have not been members of any 22local, state or national committee of a political party; or 23officers or members of any standing committee of a political   HB2333 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 06070 HLH 17842 b1party; or officers or members of standing committees of any 2partisan political group or organization. Nor shall the 3appointee during his or her tenure as Director become a member 4of any local, state or national committee of a political party 5or an officer or member of standing committees or any partisan 6political group or organization. 7(Source: P.A. 90-24, eff. 6-20-97.) 8    Section 10. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 9Sections 6z-100, 6z-140, 8.16a, 12, 13, 13.2, 15c, 24.1, and 1024.3 as follows: 11    (30 ILCS 105/6z-100)12    (Section scheduled to be repealed on July 1, 2025)13    Sec. 6z-100. Capital Development Board Revolving Fund; 14payments into and use. All monies received by the Capital 15Development Board for publications or copies issued by the 16Board, and all monies received for contract administration 17fees, charges, or reimbursements owing to the Board shall be 18deposited into a special fund known as the Capital Development 19Board Revolving Fund, which is hereby created in the State 20treasury. The monies in this Fund shall be used by the Capital 21Development Board, as appropriated, for expenditures for 22personal services, retirement, social security, contractual 23services, legal services, travel, commodities, printing, 24equipment, information technology electronic data processing,   HB2333 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 06070 HLH 17842 b1or telecommunications. For fiscal year 2021 and thereafter, 2the monies in this Fund may also be appropriated to and used by 3the Executive Ethics Commission for oversight and 4administration of the Chief Procurement Officer appointed 5under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 10-20 of the 6Illinois Procurement Code. Unexpended moneys in the Fund shall 7not be transferred or allocated by the Comptroller or 8Treasurer to any other fund, nor shall the Governor authorize 9the transfer or allocation of those moneys to any other fund. 10This Section is repealed July 1, 2025.11(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 12103-8, eff. 6-7-23.) 13    (30 ILCS 105/6z-140)14    Sec. 6z-140. Professions Licensure Fund. The Professions 15Licensure Fund is created as a special fund in the State 16treasury. The Fund may receive revenue from any authorized 17source, including, but not limited to, gifts, grants, awards, 18transfers, and appropriations. Subject to appropriation, the 19Department of Financial and Professional Regulation may use 20moneys in the Fund for costs directly associated with the 21procurement of information technology electronic data 22processing software, licenses, or any other information 23technology system products and for the ongoing costs of 24information technology electronic data processing software, 25licenses, or other information technology system products   HB2333 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 06070 HLH 17842 b1related to the granting, renewal, or administration of all 2licenses under the Department's jurisdiction. 3(Source: P.A. 103-588, eff. 6-5-24.) 4    (30 ILCS 105/8.16a)  (from Ch. 127, par. 144.16a)5    Sec. 8.16a. Appropriations for the procurement, 6installation, retention, maintenance, and operation of 7electronic data processing and information technology devices 8and software used by State agencies subject to subsection (e) 9of Section 1-15 of the Department of Innovation and Technology 10Act, the purchase of necessary supplies and equipment and 11accessories thereto, and all other expenses incident to the 12operation and maintenance of those electronic data processing 13and information technology devices and software are payable 14from the Technology Management Revolving Fund. However, no 15contract shall be entered into or obligation incurred for any 16expenditure from the Technology Management Revolving Fund 17until after the purpose and amount has been approved in 18writing by the Secretary of Innovation and Technology. Until 19there are sufficient funds in the Technology Management 20Revolving Fund (formerly known as the Statistical Services 21Revolving Fund) to carry out the purposes of this amendatory 22Act of 1965, however, the State agencies subject to subsection 23(b) of Section 1-30 of the Department of Innovation and 24Technology Act shall, on written approval of the Secretary of 25Innovation and Technology, pay the cost of operating and   HB2333 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 06070 HLH 17842 b1maintaining information technology electronic data processing 2systems from current appropriations as classified and 3standardized in the State Finance Act.4(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 102-376, eff. 1-1-22.) 5    (30 ILCS 105/12)  (from Ch. 127, par. 148)6    Sec. 12. Each voucher for traveling expenses shall 7indicate the purpose of the travel as required by applicable 8travel regulations, shall be itemized, and shall be 9accompanied by all receipts specified in the applicable travel 10regulations and by a certificate, signed by the person 11incurring such expense, certifying that the amount is correct 12and just; that the detailed items charged for subsistence were 13actually paid; that the expenses were occasioned by official 14business or unavoidable delays requiring the stay of such 15person at hotels for the time specified; that the journey was 16performed with all practicable dispatch by the shortest route 17usually traveled in the customary reasonable manner; and that 18such person has not been furnished with transportation or 19money in lieu thereof; for any part of the journey therein 20charged for.21    Upon written approval by the Office of the Comptroller, a 22State agency may submit electronic travel vouchers under 23procedures and controls prescribed by the Comptroller. 24    Upon written approval by the Office of the Comptroller, a 25State agency may maintain the original travel voucher, the   HB2333 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 06070 HLH 17842 b1receipts, and the proof of the traveler's signature on the 2traveler's certification statement at the office of the State 3agency. However, except as otherwise provided in this Section 4for State public institutions of higher education, nothing in 5this Section shall be construed to exempt a State agency from 6submitting a detailed travel voucher as prescribed by the 7Office of the Comptroller. Each State public institution of 8higher education is exempt from submitting a detailed travel 9voucher to the Office of the Comptroller but shall retain all 10receipts specified in the applicable travel regulations and 11shall annually publish a record of those expenditures on its 12official website using a form that it prescribes. 13    An information copy of each voucher covering a claim by a 14person subject to the official travel regulations promulgated 15under Section 12-2 for travel reimbursement involving an 16exception to the general restrictions of such travel 17regulations shall be filed with the applicable travel control 18board which shall consider these vouchers, or a report 19thereof, for approval. Amounts disbursed for travel 20reimbursement claims which are disapproved by the applicable 21travel control board shall be refunded by the traveler and 22deposited in the fund or account from which payment was made.23    As used in this Section, "State public institution of 24higher education" means the governing boards of the University 25of Illinois, Southern Illinois University, Illinois State 26University, Eastern Illinois University, Northern Illinois   HB2333 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 06070 HLH 17842 b1University, Western Illinois University, Chicago State 2University, Governors State University, and Northeastern 3Illinois University. 4(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 1-1-24.) 5    (30 ILCS 105/13)  (from Ch. 127, par. 149)6    (Text of Section WITH the changes made by P.A. 98-599, 7which has been held unconstitutional)8    Sec. 13. The objects and purposes for which appropriations 9are made are classified and standardized by items as follows:10    (1) Personal services;11    (2) State contribution for employee group insurance;12    (3) Contractual services;13    (4) Travel;14    (5) Commodities;15    (6) Equipment;16    (7) Permanent improvements;17    (8) Land;18    (9) Information Technology Electronic Data Processing;19    (10) Operation of automotive equipment;20    (11) Telecommunications services;21    (12) Contingencies;22    (13) Reserve;23    (14) Interest;24    (15) Awards and Grants;25    (16) Debt Retirement;  HB2333 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 06070 HLH 17842 b1    (17) Non-Cost Charges;2    (18) State retirement contribution for annual normal cost; 3    (19) State retirement contribution for unfunded accrued 4liability; 5    (20) Purchase Contract for Real Estate.6    When an appropriation is made to an officer, department, 7institution, board, commission or other agency, or to a 8private association or corporation, in one or more of the 9items above specified, such appropriation shall be construed 10in accordance with the definitions and limitations specified 11in this Act, unless the appropriation act otherwise provides.12    An appropriation for a purpose other than one specified 13and defined in this Act may be made only as an additional, 14separate and distinct item, specifically stating the object 15and purpose thereof.16(Source: P.A. 98-599, eff. 6-1-14.) 17    (Text of Section WITHOUT the changes made by P.A. 98-599, 18which has been held unconstitutional)19    Sec. 13. The objects and purposes for which appropriations 20are made are classified and standardized by items as follows:21    (1) Personal services;22    (2) State contribution for employee group insurance;23    (3) Contractual services;24    (4) Travel;25    (5) Commodities;  HB2333 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 06070 HLH 17842 b1    (6) Equipment;2    (7) Permanent improvements;3    (8) Land;4    (9) Information Technology Electronic Data Processing;5    (10) Operation of automotive equipment;6    (11) Telecommunications services;7    (12) Contingencies;8    (13) Reserve;9    (14) Interest;10    (15) Awards and Grants;11    (16) Debt Retirement;12    (17) Non-Cost Charges;13    (18) Purchase Contract for Real Estate.14    When an appropriation is made to an officer, department, 15institution, board, commission or other agency, or to a 16private association or corporation, in one or more of the 17items above specified, such appropriation shall be construed 18in accordance with the definitions and limitations specified 19in this Act, unless the appropriation act otherwise provides.20    An appropriation for a purpose other than one specified 21and defined in this Act may be made only as an additional, 22separate and distinct item, specifically stating the object 23and purpose thereof.24(Source: P.A. 84-263; 84-264.) 25    (30 ILCS 105/13.2)  (from Ch. 127, par. 149.2)  HB2333 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 06070 HLH 17842 b1    Sec. 13.2. Transfers among line item appropriations. 2    (a) Transfers among line item appropriations from the same 3treasury fund for the objects specified in this Section may be 4made in the manner provided in this Section when the balance 5remaining in one or more such line item appropriations is 6insufficient for the purpose for which the appropriation was 7made.8    (a-1) No transfers may be made from one agency to another 9agency, nor may transfers be made from one institution of 10higher education to another institution of higher education 11except as provided by subsection (a-4). 12    (a-2) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, 13transfers may be made only among the objects of expenditure 14enumerated in this Section, except that no funds may be 15transferred from any appropriation for personal services, from 16any appropriation for State contributions to the State 17Employees' Retirement System, from any separate appropriation 18for employee retirement contributions paid by the employer, 19nor from any appropriation for State contribution for employee 20group insurance. 21    (a-2.5) (Blank). 22    (a-3) Further, if an agency receives a separate 23appropriation for employee retirement contributions paid by 24the employer, any transfer by that agency into an 25appropriation for personal services must be accompanied by a 26corresponding transfer into the appropriation for employee   HB2333 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 06070 HLH 17842 b1retirement contributions paid by the employer, in an amount 2sufficient to meet the employer share of the employee 3contributions required to be remitted to the retirement 4system.5    (a-4) Long-Term Care Rebalancing. The Governor may 6designate amounts set aside for institutional services 7appropriated from the General Revenue Fund or any other State 8fund that receives monies for long-term care services to be 9transferred to all State agencies responsible for the 10administration of community-based long-term care programs, 11including, but not limited to, community-based long-term care 12programs administered by the Department of Healthcare and 13Family Services, the Department of Human Services, and the 14Department on Aging, provided that the Director of Healthcare 15and Family Services first certifies that the amounts being 16transferred are necessary for the purpose of assisting persons 17in or at risk of being in institutional care to transition to 18community-based settings, including the financial data needed 19to prove the need for the transfer of funds. The total amounts 20transferred shall not exceed 4% in total of the amounts 21appropriated from the General Revenue Fund or any other State 22fund that receives monies for long-term care services for each 23fiscal year. A notice of the fund transfer must be made to the 24General Assembly and posted at a minimum on the Department of 25Healthcare and Family Services website, the Governor's Office 26of Management and Budget website, and any other website the   HB2333 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 06070 HLH 17842 b1Governor sees fit. These postings shall serve as notice to the 2General Assembly of the amounts to be transferred. Notice 3shall be given at least 30 days prior to transfer. 4    (b) In addition to the general transfer authority provided 5under subsection (c), the following agencies have the specific 6transfer authority granted in this subsection:7    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services is 8authorized to make transfers representing savings attributable 9to not increasing grants due to the births of additional 10children from line items for payments of cash grants to line 11items for payments for employment and social services for the 12purposes outlined in subsection (f) of Section 4-2 of the 13Illinois Public Aid Code.14    The Department of Children and Family Services is 15authorized to make transfers not exceeding 2% of the aggregate 16amount appropriated to it within the same treasury fund for 17the following line items among these same line items: Foster 18Home and Specialized Foster Care and Prevention, Institutions 19and Group Homes and Prevention, and Purchase of Adoption and 20Guardianship Services.21    The Department on Aging is authorized to make transfers 22not exceeding 10% of the aggregate amount appropriated to it 23within the same treasury fund for the following Community Care 24Program line items among these same line items: purchase of 25services covered by the Community Care Program and 26Comprehensive Case Coordination.  HB2333 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 06070 HLH 17842 b1    The State Board of Education is authorized to make 2transfers from line item appropriations within the same 3treasury fund for General State Aid, General State Aid - Hold 4Harmless, and Evidence-Based Funding, provided that no such 5transfer may be made unless the amount transferred is no 6longer required for the purpose for which that appropriation 7was made, to the line item appropriation for Transitional 8Assistance when the balance remaining in such line item 9appropriation is insufficient for the purpose for which the 10appropriation was made.11    The State Board of Education is authorized to make 12transfers between the following line item appropriations 13within the same treasury fund: Disabled Student 14Services/Materials (Section 14-13.01 of the School Code), 15Disabled Student Transportation Reimbursement (Section 1614-13.01 of the School Code), Disabled Student Tuition - 17Private Tuition (Section 14-7.02 of the School Code), 18Extraordinary Special Education (Section 14-7.02b of the 19School Code), Reimbursement for Free Lunch/Breakfast Program, 20Summer School Payments (Section 18-4.3 of the School Code), 21and Transportation - Regular/Vocational Reimbursement (Section 2229-5 of the School Code). Such transfers shall be made only 23when the balance remaining in one or more such line item 24appropriations is insufficient for the purpose for which the 25appropriation was made and provided that no such transfer may 26be made unless the amount transferred is no longer required   HB2333 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 06070 HLH 17842 b1for the purpose for which that appropriation was made. 2    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services is 3authorized to make transfers not exceeding 4% of the aggregate 4amount appropriated to it, within the same treasury fund, 5among the various line items appropriated for Medical 6Assistance. 7    The Department of Central Management Services is 8authorized to make transfers not exceeding 2% of the aggregate 9amount appropriated to it, within the same treasury fund, from 10the various line items appropriated to the Department, into 11the following line item appropriations: auto liability claims 12and related expenses and payment of claims under the State 13Employee Indemnification Act.14    (c) The sum of such transfers for an agency in a fiscal 15year shall not exceed 2% of the aggregate amount appropriated 16to it within the same treasury fund for the following objects: 17Personal Services; Extra Help; Student and Inmate 18Compensation; State Contributions to Retirement Systems; State 19Contributions to Social Security; State Contribution for 20Employee Group Insurance; Contractual Services; Travel; 21Commodities; Printing; Equipment; Information Technology 22Electronic Data Processing; Operation of Automotive Equipment; 23Telecommunications Services; Travel and Allowance for 24Committed, Paroled and Discharged Prisoners; Library Books; 25Federal Matching Grants for Student Loans; Refunds; Workers' 26Compensation, Occupational Disease, and Tort Claims; Late   HB2333 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 06070 HLH 17842 b1Interest Penalties under the State Prompt Payment Act and 2Sections 368a and 370a of the Illinois Insurance Code; and, in 3appropriations to institutions of higher education, Awards and 4Grants. Notwithstanding the above, any amounts appropriated 5for payment of workers' compensation claims to an agency to 6which the authority to evaluate, administer and pay such 7claims has been delegated by the Department of Central 8Management Services may be transferred to any other 9expenditure object where such amounts exceed the amount 10necessary for the payment of such claims.11    (c-1) (Blank).12    (c-2) (Blank). 13    (c-3) (Blank). 14    (c-4) (Blank).15    (c-5) (Blank). 16    (c-6) (Blank). 17    (c-7) (Blank). 18    (c-8) (Blank). 19    (c-9) (Blank). 20    (c-10) Special provisions for State fiscal year 2024. 21Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, for State 22fiscal year 2024, transfers among line item appropriations to 23a State agency from the same State treasury fund may be made 24for operational or lump sum expenses only, provided that the 25sum of such transfers for a State agency in State fiscal year 262024 shall not exceed 8% of the aggregate amount appropriated   HB2333 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 06070 HLH 17842 b1to that State agency for operational or lump sum expenses for 2State fiscal year 2024. For the purpose of this subsection, 3"operational or lump sum expenses" includes the following 4objects: personal services; extra help; student and inmate 5compensation; State contributions to retirement systems; State 6contributions to social security; State contributions for 7employee group insurance; contractual services; travel; 8commodities; printing; equipment; information technology 9electronic data processing; operation of automotive equipment; 10telecommunications services; travel and allowance for 11committed, paroled, and discharged prisoners; library books; 12federal matching grants for student loans; refunds; workers' 13compensation, occupational disease, and tort claims; late 14interest penalties under the State Prompt Payment Act and 15Sections 368a and 370a of the Illinois Insurance Code; lump 16sum and other purposes; and lump sum operations. For the 17purpose of this subsection, "State agency" does not include 18the Attorney General, the Comptroller, the Treasurer, or the 19judicial or legislative branches. 20    (c-11) Special provisions for State fiscal year 2025. 21Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, for State 22fiscal year 2025, transfers among line item appropriations to 23a State agency from the same State treasury fund may be made 24for operational or lump sum expenses only, provided that the 25sum of such transfers for a State agency in State fiscal year 262025 shall not exceed 4% of the aggregate amount appropriated   HB2333 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 06070 HLH 17842 b1to that State agency for operational or lump sum expenses for 2State fiscal year 2025. For the purpose of this subsection, 3"operational or lump sum expenses" includes the following 4objects: personal services; extra help; student and inmate 5compensation; State contributions to retirement systems; State 6contributions to social security; State contributions for 7employee group insurance; contractual services; travel; 8commodities; printing; equipment; information technology 9electronic data processing; operation of automotive equipment; 10telecommunications services; travel and allowance for 11committed, paroled, and discharged prisoners; library books; 12federal matching grants for student loans; refunds; workers' 13compensation, occupational disease, and tort claims; late 14interest penalties under the State Prompt Payment Act and 15Sections 368a and 370a of the Illinois Insurance Code; lump 16sum and other purposes; and lump sum operations. For the 17purpose of this subsection, "State agency" does not include 18the Attorney General, the Comptroller, the Treasurer, or the 19judicial or legislative branches. 20    (d) Transfers among appropriations made to agencies of the 21Legislative and Judicial departments and to the 22constitutionally elected officers in the Executive branch 23require the approval of the officer authorized in Section 10 24of this Act to approve and certify vouchers. Transfers among 25appropriations made to the University of Illinois, Southern 26Illinois University, Chicago State University, Eastern   HB2333 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 06070 HLH 17842 b1Illinois University, Governors State University, Illinois 2State University, Northeastern Illinois University, Northern 3Illinois University, Western Illinois University, the Illinois 4Mathematics and Science Academy and the Board of Higher 5Education require the approval of the Board of Higher 6Education and the Governor. Transfers among appropriations to 7all other agencies require the approval of the Governor.8    The officer responsible for approval shall certify that 9the transfer is necessary to carry out the programs and 10purposes for which the appropriations were made by the General 11Assembly and shall transmit to the State Comptroller a 12certified copy of the approval which shall set forth the 13specific amounts transferred so that the Comptroller may 14change his records accordingly. The Comptroller shall furnish 15the Governor with information copies of all transfers approved 16for agencies of the Legislative and Judicial departments and 17transfers approved by the constitutionally elected officials 18of the Executive branch other than the Governor, showing the 19amounts transferred and indicating the dates such changes were 20entered on the Comptroller's records.21    (e) The State Board of Education, in consultation with the 22State Comptroller, may transfer line item appropriations for 23General State Aid or Evidence-Based Funding among the Common 24School Fund and the Education Assistance Fund, and, for State 25fiscal year 2020 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Fund for 26the Advancement of Education. With the advice and consent of   HB2333 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 06070 HLH 17842 b1the Governor's Office of Management and Budget, the State 2Board of Education, in consultation with the State 3Comptroller, may transfer line item appropriations between the 4General Revenue Fund and the Education Assistance Fund for the 5following programs:6        (1) Disabled Student Personnel Reimbursement (Section 7    14-13.01 of the School Code);8        (2) Disabled Student Transportation Reimbursement 9    (subsection (b) of Section 14-13.01 of the School Code);10        (3) Disabled Student Tuition - Private Tuition 11    (Section 14-7.02 of the School Code);12        (4) Extraordinary Special Education (Section 14-7.02b 13    of the School Code);14        (5) Reimbursement for Free Lunch/Breakfast Programs;15        (6) Summer School Payments (Section 18-4.3 of the 16    School Code);17        (7) Transportation - Regular/Vocational Reimbursement 18    (Section 29-5 of the School Code);19        (8) Regular Education Reimbursement (Section 18-3 of 20    the School Code); and21        (9) Special Education Reimbursement (Section 14-7.03 22    of the School Code). 23    (f) For State fiscal year 2020 and each fiscal year 24thereafter, the Department on Aging, in consultation with the 25State Comptroller, with the advice and consent of the 26Governor's Office of Management and Budget, may transfer line   HB2333 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 06070 HLH 17842 b1item appropriations for purchase of services covered by the 2Community Care Program between the General Revenue Fund and 3the Commitment to Human Services Fund.4    (g) For State fiscal year 2024 and each fiscal year 5thereafter, if requested by an agency chief executive officer 6and authorized and approved by the Comptroller, the 7Comptroller may direct and the Treasurer shall transfer funds 8from the General Revenue Fund to fund payroll expenses that 9meet the payroll transaction exception criteria as defined by 10the Comptroller in the Statewide Accounting Management System 11(SAMS) Manual. The agency shall then transfer these funds back 12to the General Revenue Fund within 7 days. 13(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 14103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-588, eff. 6-5-24.) 15    (30 ILCS 105/15c)  (from Ch. 127, par. 151c)16    Sec. 15c. The item "printing" when used in an 17appropriation Act means and includes expenditures for 18contracted services, materials and supplies where the 19principal function or purpose of the resulting product is the 20dissemination of printed information. These costs include all 21types of printing processes such as letterpress, offset and 22gravure, but not expenditures included in "commodities" as 23defined in Section 15b and "information technology" 24"electronic data processing" as defined in Section 24.1.25(Source: P.A. 81-1192.)   HB2333 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 06070 HLH 17842 b1    (30 ILCS 105/24.1)  (from Ch. 127, par. 160.1)2    Sec. 24.1. The item "information technology" "electronic 3data processing" means, and when used in an appropriation act, 4includes all expenditures incurred for the lease, rental or 5purchase of information technology electronic data processing 6equipment and related devices, supplies, services, material 7and space therefor, and personal services needed, including 8expenditures for the acquisition of information technology 9electronic data processing equipment under multi-year lease, 10lease-purchase or installment purchase contracts for terms of 11not more than the terms established in the Illinois 12Procurement Code 7 years. Funds appropriated for information 13technology electronic data processing may be expended to pay 14any penalty resulting from the cancellation of a multi-year 15agreement or contract required because funds are not 16appropriated for the continuation of the multi-year agreement 17or contract. 18(Source: P.A. 81-1134.) 19    (30 ILCS 105/24.3)  (from Ch. 127, par. 160.3)20    Sec. 24.3. The item "telecommunication services", when 21used in an appropriation act, means and includes all 22expenditures incurred for the lease, rental or purchase of 23telecommunications interconnection facility equipment, 24supplies, maintenance, services and space therefore, and   HB2333 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 06070 HLH 17842 b1related personal services but not including personal services 2for the operation of single agency systems. Telecommunications 3services shall include but is not limited to the 4interconnection of educational television, radio and computers 5but shall not include the preparation of or the content of the 6subject matter transmitted. Telecommunications equipment 7includes, but is not limited to, wireless or wired systems for 8the transport of voice, video, and data communications, and 9all related interactions between people and machines. 10telephone, radio, teletype, teletypewriter, computer and other 11voice, data, or video interconnection facility systems.12(Source: P.A. 76-2426.) 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.